Utah statutes.
59-12-705.   Free or reduced admission day available to all state residents.

Each botanical, cultural, or zoological organization that receives money from a tax imposed under the authority of this part and that periodically offers a waived or discounted admission fee shall make such waived or discounted admission available to all residents of the state.

